Arkansas, session 2025, HB1095.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Department of Commerce - State Bank Department for the 2025-2026
fiscal year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U049U ACOM STATE BANK COMMISSIONER 1 GRADE SE04
(2) U086U ACOM BANK DEPUTY COMMISSIONER 2 GRADE SE02
(3) D002N STATE DATABASE ADMINISTRATOR LEAD 1 GRADE IT11
(4) D012C DATABASE SPECIALIST 2 GRADE IT08
*MAH014*
03-18-2025 17:11:16 MAH014

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1095
(5) D022C SYSTEMS SPECIALIST 1 GRADE IT06
(6) A005N ACOM ASST DEPUTY BANK COMMISSIONER 6 GRADE GS15
(7) A030C ACOM BANK CERTIFIED EXAM MANAGER 9 GRADE GS14
(8) G257C ACOM BANK CHIEF COUNSEL 1 GRADE GS14
(9) A018C ACOM BANK CHIEF EXAMINER 1 GRADE GS14
(10) A039C CERTIFIED BANK SENIOR EXAMINER 59 GRADE GS13
(11) R019C BUDGET MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(12) A038C FISCAL SUPPORT MANAGER 1 GRADE GS09
(13) C010C EXECUTIVE ASSISTANT TO THE DIRECTOR 1 GRADE GS07
(14) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 3 GRADE GS06
(15) B076C RESEARCH PROJECT ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
(16) C056C ADMINISTRATIVE SPECIALIST III 1 GRADE GS04
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 92

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Commerce - State Bank Department for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: four
(4) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Bank Department Fund,
for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of Commerce -
State Bank Department for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026, the
following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $8,935,898
(02) EXTRA HELP 200,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 2,805,220
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 2,000,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 375,000
03-18-2025 17:11:16 MAH014

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1095
(C) PROF. FEES 100,000
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 350,000
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $14,766,118

SECTION 4. REGULAR SALARIES. There is hereby established for the
Department of Commerce - State Securities Department for the 2025-2026 fiscal
year, the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item Class No. of Fiscal Year
No. Code Title Employees 2025-2026
(1) U040U ACOM SECURITIES COMMISSIONER 1 GRADE SE02
(2) D007C INFORMATION SYSTEMS MANAGER 1 GRADE IT08
(3) N137N ACOM SECURITIES DEPUTY COMMISSIONER 1 GRADE GS14
(4) X008C ACOM SECURITIES CHIEF EXAMINER 2 GRADE GS13
(5) G004C MANAGING ATTORNEY 1 GRADE GS13
(6) G025C ATTORNEY SUPERVISOR 1 GRADE GS12
(7) A014C FISCAL DIVISION MANAGER 1 GRADE GS12
(8) A027C ACCOUNTING OPERATIONS MANAGER 1 GRADE GS11
(9) X015C ACOM SECURITIES EXAMINER SUPERVISOR 5 GRADE GS11
(10) G047C ATTORNEY SPECIALIST 4 GRADE GS11
(11) X032C ACOM SENIOR SECURITIES EXAMINER 15 GRADE GS09
(12) X061C ACOM SECURITIES EXAMINER 4 GRADE GS07
(13) A076C FINANCE PROGRAM ANALYST 1 GRADE GS07
(14) A075C FINANCIAL ANALYST I 1 GRADE GS07
(15) C037C ADMINISTRATIVE ANALYST 2 GRADE GS06
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 41

SECTION 5. EXTRA HELP. There is hereby authorized, for the Department
of Commerce - State Securities Department for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes: three
(3) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at rates of pay not to
exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and Compensation Act, or
03-18-2025 17:11:16 MAH014

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1095
its successor, or this act for the appropriate classification.

SECTION 6. APPROPRIATION - OPERATIONS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Securities Department
Fund, for personal services and operating expenses of the Department of
Commerce - State Securities Department for the fiscal year ending June 30,
2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $2,765,358
(02) EXTRA HELP 50,000
(03) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 952,480
(04) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 600,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 75,000
(C) PROF. FEES 20,984
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(05) EXAMINATION TRAVEL 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $4,483,822

SECTION 7. APPROPRIATION - REFUNDS AND REIMBURSEMENTS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the cash
funds as defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for refunds and reimbursements of
the Department of Commerce - State Securities Department for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REFUNDS/REIMBURSEMENTS $50,000

SECTION 8. APPROPRIATION - INVESTOR EDUCATION FUND. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Department of Commerce, to be payable from the Investor
Education Fund, for operating expenses, promotional items, and grants of the
Department of Commerce - State Securities Department for the fiscal year
03-18-2025 17:11:16 MAH014

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1095
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE $36,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,000
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(02) GRANTS AND AID 250,000
(03) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 20,000
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $316,000

SECTION 9. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, or their successors, and other fiscal
control laws of this State, where applicable, and regulations promulgated by
the Department of Finance and Administration, as authorized by law, shall be
strictly complied with in disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 10. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 11. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits
the appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
03-18-2025 17:11:16 MAH014

As Engrossed: H3/18/25 HB1095
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.

/s/Joint Budget Committee


























03-18-2025 17:11:16 MAH014